en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing > Baby & Children's Clothing > Baby & Children's Outerwear > Baby & Children's Coats & Jackets: Bolero Jackets; Bomber Jackets; Capes; Motorcycle Outerwear; Overcoats; Parkas; Pea Coats; Ponchos; Puffer Jackets; Rain Coats; Sport Jackets; Track Jackets; Trench Coats; Trucker Jackets; Windbreakers; Wrap Coats
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Roupas > Roupas para bebês e crianças > Vestuário externo para bebês e crianças > Casacos e jaquetas para bebês e crianças: Boleros; Jaquetas bomber; Capas; Vestuário externo para motociclistas; Sobretudos; Parkas; Casacos peacoat; Ponchos; Jaquetas puffer; Capas de chuva; Jaquetas esportivas; Jaquetas de trilha; Trench coats; Jaquetas trucker; Jaquetas corta-vento; Casacos transpassados
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Odzież > Odzież dla niemowląt i dzieci > Odzież wierzchnia dla niemowląt i dzieci > Płaszczyki i kurtki dla niemowląt i dzieci: Bolerka; Bomberki; Peleryny; Odzież motocyklowa; Palta; Parki; Płaszcze typu bosmanka; Poncza; Kurtki pikowane; Płaszcze przeciwdeszczowe; Kurtki sportowe; Kurtki dresowe; Trencze; Kurtki typu trucker; Wiatrówki; Płaszcze kopertowe
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Oblačila > Oblačila za dojenčke in otroke > Zunanja oblačila za dojenčke in otroke > Plašči in jakne za dojenčke in otroke: Boleri; Bomber jakne; Pelerine; Zunanja motoristična oblačila; Dolgi plašči; Parke; Mornarski plašči; Ponči; Puhovke; Dežni plašči; Športne jakne; Pohodniške jakne; Trenčkoti; Jakne v slogu tovornjakarjev; Vetrovke; Plašči z zavezovanjem
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klesplagg > Baby- og barneklær > Yttertøy til babyer og barn > Frakker og jakker til babyer og barn: Bolerojakker; Bomberjakker; Caper; Motorsykkelyttertøy; Overfrakker; Parkas; Losjakker; Ponchoer; Pufferjakker; Regnjakker; Sportsjakker; Løpejakker; Trenchcoater; Truckerjakker; Vindjakker; Omslagsjakker
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Giyim Eşyaları > Bebek ve Çocuk Giyim > Bebek ve Çocuk Üst Giyim > Bebek ve Çocuk Mont ve Ceketleri: Bolero Ceket; Bomber Ceket; Pelerin; Motosikletçi Ceketi; Palto; Parka; Denizci Montu; Panço; Şişme Ceket; Yağmurluk; Spor Ceket; Track Ceket; Trençkot; Kamyoncu Ceketi; Rüzgarlık; Şal Palto
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Одежда > Детская одежда > Детская верхняя одежда > Детские куртки, пальто и плащи: Болеро; Бомберы; Плащи; Мотоэкипировка; Пальто; Парки; Полупальто; Пончо; Пуховики; Дождевики; Спортивные куртки; Олимпийки; Тренчи; Джинсовые куртки; Ветровки; Пальто с запахом
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházat > Baba- és gyermekruházat > Baba- és gyermek kültéri ruházat > Baba- és gyermekkabátok és -dzsekik: Bolero dzsekik; Bomber dzsekik; Köpenyek; Motoros kültéri ruházat; Hosszított kabátok; Parka kabátok; Pea kabátok; Poncsók; Pufidzsekik; Esőkabátok; Sportos dzsekik; Sportdzsekik; Ballonkabátok; Kamionos dzsekik; Széldzsekik; Megkötős kabátok
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Îmbrăcăminte > Îmbrăcăminte pentru bebeluși și copii > Îmbrăcăminte de exterior pentru bebeluși și copii > Paltoane și geci pentru bebeluși și copii: Geci bolero; Geci bomber; Cape; Îmbrăcăminte de exterior pentru motocicletă; Paltoane; Geci parka; Paltoane la două rânduri de nasturi; Ponchouri; Geci cu puf; Pelerine de ploaie; Geci sport; Geci de trening; Trenciuri; Geci scurte; Geci antivânt; Paltoane petrecute
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatteet > Vauvojen ja lasten vaatteet > Vauvojen ja lasten ulkovaatteet > Vauvojen ja lasten päällystakit ja takit: Bolerotakit; Pilottitakit; Viitat; Ulkovaatteet moottoripyöräilyyn; Päällystakit; Parkatakit; Kansitakit; Ponchot; Toppatakit; Sadetakit; Urheilutakit; Verryttelytakit; Trenssitakit; Farkkutakit; Tuulitakit; Kietaisutakit
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Vêtements > Vêtements pour bébés et enfants > Vêtements de plein air pour bébés et enfants > Manteaux et vestes pour bébés et enfants: Vestes boléro; Vestes bomber; Capes; Vêtements d’extérieur pour motocyclistes; Pardessus; Parkas; Cabans; Ponchos; Manteaux bouffants; Imperméables; Vestes de sport; Vestes de survêtement; Trenchs; Vestes de camionneur; Coupe-vents; Manteaux portefeuille
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Oblečenie > Oblečenie pre bábätká a deti > Vrchné oblečenie pre bábätká a deti > Kabáty a bundy pre bábätká a deti: Bolerá; Bomberky; Peleríny; Vrchné oblečenie pre motorkárov; Kabáty; Parky; Krátke kabáty; Pončá; Páperové bundy; Plášte do dažďa; Športové bundy; Teplákové bundy; Trenčkoty; Denimové bundy; Vetrovky; Kabáty s opaskom
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装 > 婴儿及儿童服饰 > 婴儿及儿童外套 > 婴儿及儿童大衣与夹克: 博莱罗夹克; 飞行员夹克; 斗篷; 摩托车外套; 大衣; 派克大衣; 海军大衣; 披风; 羽绒服; 雨衣; 便服外套; 运动夹克; 风衣; 卡车司机夹克; 防风夹克; 束带大衣
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidung > Baby- & Kinderbekleidung > Oberbekleidung für Babys & Kinder > Mäntel & Jacken für Babys & Kinder: Bolero-Jacken; Bomberjacken; Umhänge; Motorradüberbekleidung; Mäntel; Parkas; Caban-Jacken; Ponchos; Pufferjacken; Regenmäntel; Sportjacken; Trainingsjacken; Trenchcoats; Trucker-Jacken; Windjacken; Wickelmäntel
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tøj > Tøj til babyer og børn > Overtøj til babyer og børn > Frakker og jakker til babyer og børn: Bolerojakker; Bomberjakker; Kapper; Motorcykelovertøj; Overfrakker; Parkaer; Pea coats; Ponchoer; Dynejakker; Regnfrakker; Sportsjakker; Løbejakker; Trenchcoats; Truckerjakker; Vindjakker; Slå om-frakker
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužiai > Drabužiai kūdikiams ir vaikams > Viršutiniai drabužiai kūdikiams ir vaikams > Paltai ir striukės kūdikiams ir vaikams: „Bolero“ stiliaus švarkeliai; „Bomber“ stiliaus striukės; Apsiaustai; Viršutiniai drabužiai motociklininkams; Paltai; Parkos; Bušlatai; Pončai; Pūstos striukės; Lietpalčiai; Sportinės striukės; Sintetinės sportinės striukės; Trenčiniai paltai; Džinsinės striukės; Striukės nuo vėjo; Paltai su diržu
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 衣料品 > ベビー＆子供服 > ベビー＆キッズ用アウター > ベビー＆キッズ用コート・ジャケット: ボレロジャケット; ボンバージャケット; ケープ; バイク用アウターウェア; オーバーコート; パーカー; ピーコート; ポンチョ; パファージャケット; レインコート; スポーツジャケット; トラックジャケット; トレンチコート; トラッカージャケット; ウインドブレーカー; ラップコート
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Quấn áo > Quần áo trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ em > Áo khoác cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ em > Áo khoác & áo jacket cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ em: Áo khoác lửng; Áo khoác bomber; Áo khoác cánh dơi; Áo khoác ngoài khi đi mô tô; Áo măng tô; Áo khoác lót lông có mũ; Áo khoác hải quân; Áo choàng poncho; Áo phao; Áo mưa; Áo khoác thể thao; Áo khoác thể thao có khóa kéo; Áo choàng dài đi mưa; Áo khoác tài xế xe tải; Áo gió; Áo khoác vạt đắp
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädsel > Baby- och barnkläder > Ytterkläder för baby och barn > Kappor & jackor för baby och barn: Boleros; Bomberjackor; Kappor; MC-ytterkläder; Överrockar; Parkas; Skepparkavajer; Ponchos; Pufferjackor; Regnrockar; Sportjackor; Träningsjackor; Trenchcoats; Jeansjackor; Vindjackor; Omlottjackor
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 > 유아동복 > 유아 및 아동 아우터웨어 > 유아 및 아동 코트 및 재킷: 볼레로 재킷; 바머 재킷; 케이프; 오토바이 겉옷; 오버코트; 파카; 피코트; 판초; 패딩 재킷; 레인코트; 스포츠 재킷; 트랙 재킷; 트렌치 코트; 트러커 재킷; 바람막이; 랩 코트
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Облекло > Дрехи за бебета и деца > Външно облекло за бебета и деца > Палта и якета за бебета и деца: Якета „болеро“; Якета „бомбър“; Пелерини; Връхни дрехи за мотоциклетисти; Дълги палта; Парки; Моряшки палта; Пончо; Пухени якета; Дъждобрани; Спортни якета; Леки спортни якета; Тренчкоти; Дънкови якета; Ветроустойчиви якета; Палта с прехлупване
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Ενδύματα > Βρεφικά & Παιδικά Ρούχα > Βρεφικά & παιδικά πανωφόρια > Βρεφικά & παιδικά παλτό & μπουφάν: Μπολερό; Bomber Jackets; Κάπες; Ενδύματα προστασίας για αναβάτες μοτοσικλέτας; Πανωφόρια; Μπουφάν παρκά; Παλτό Peacoat; Πόντσο; Μπουφάν Puffer; Παλτό βροχής; Αθλητικά μπουφάν; Αθλητικές ζακέτες; Καμπαρντίνες; Μπουφάν Trucker; Αντιανεμικά; Παλτό Wrap Coats
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > เสื้อผ้า > เสื้อผ้าเด็กและทารก > เสื้อคลุมสำหรับทารกและเด็ก > เสื้อโค้ทและแจ็คเก็ตสำหรับเด็กและทารก: แจ็คเก็ตลูกไม้; บอมเบอร์แจ็คเก็ต; ผ้าคลุมไหล่; เสื้อขี่มอเตอร์ไซค์; เสื้อโค้ทกันหนาว; เสื้อปาร์กา; เสื้อโค้ทตัวสั้น; เสื้อปอนโช; เสื้อพัฟเฟอร์; เสื้อกันฝน; เสื้อเล่นกีฬา; เสื้อแทร็คแจ็คเก็ต; เสื้อโค้ทตัวยาว; เสื้อทรงทรัคเกอร์; เสื้อกันลม; เสื้อโค้ทแบบรัดเอว
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Vestuário > Roupa para bebé e criança > Agasalhos para bebé e criança > Cascos e blusões para bebé e criança: Boleros; Blusões bomber; Capas; Casacos de motociclismo; Sobretudos; Parcas; Casacos de marinheiro em lã; Ponchos; Casacos acolchoados; Impermeáveis; Casacos desportivos; Casacos de fato de treino; Gabardinas; Blusões trucker; Corta-ventos; Casacos traçados
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oblečení > Oblečení pro miminka a děti > Dětské a kojenecké oblečení na ven > Kabáty a bundy pro děti a kojence: Bolerka; Bombery; Pláště; Oblečení na motorku; Svrchníky; Parky; Námořnické kabáty; Ponča; Péřové bundy; Pláště do deště; Sportovní bundy; Teplákové bundy; Trenčkoty; Džínové bundy; Větrovky; Klasické kabáty
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Abbigliamento > Abbigliamento per neonati e bambini > Abbigliamento da esterno per neonati e bambini > Cappottini e giacche per neonati e bambini: Giacche bolero; Bomber; Mantelle; Abbigliamento per moto; Cappotti; Parka; Cappotti doppiopetto; Poncho; Piumini; Impermeabili; Giacche sportive; Giacche da tuta; Trench; Giacche trucker; Giacche a vento; Cappotti a portafoglio
es: Ropa y accesorios > Prendas de vestir > Ropa para bebés y niños > Ropa de abrigo para bebés y niños > Abrigos y chaquetas para bebés y niños: Chaquetas bolero; Chaquetas bomber; Capas; Ropa de motociclista; Sobretodo; Parkas; Abrigos peacoat; Ponchos; Chaquetas acolchadas; Impermeables; Chaquetas deportivas; Chaquetas deportivas; Gabardinas; Cazadoras vaqueras; Chaquetas impermeables; Abrigos envolventes
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Odjeća > Odjeća za bebe i djecu > Odjeća za van za bebe i djecu > Kaputi i jakne za bebe i djecu: Bolero jakne; Bomber jakne; Pelerine; Motociklistička odjeća za van; Kaputi; Parke; Mornarski kaputi; Pončo; Pufer jakne; Kabanice; Sportske jakne; Gornji dio trenirke za trčanje; Baloneri; Traper jakne; Vjetrovke; Kaputi na vezanje
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kleding > Baby- en kinderkleding > Baby- & kinderbovenkleding > Baby- & kinderjassen & jacks: Bolero-jassen; Bomberjacks; Capes; Motorkleding; Overjassen; Parka's; Peacoats; Poncho's; Gewatteerde jassen; Regenjassen; Sportjassen; Trainingsjassen; Trenchcoats; Truckerjassen; Windjacks; Wikkeljassen
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著 > 嬰兒與兒童服裝 > 嬰兒與兒童外套 > 嬰兒與兒童大衣和外套: 短下擺外套; 飛行員外套; 披肩; 機車騎士外套; 大衣; 派克大衣; 海軍大衣; 彭丘斗篷; 羽絨外套; 雨衣; 運動外套; 休閒運動外套; 風衣外套; 卡車司機外套; 風衣; 裹式外套